Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article XI. Conservation.

§ 1. Natural resources and historical sites of the Commonwealth.

To the end that the people have clean air, pure water, and the use and enjoyment for recreation of adequate public lands, waters, and other natural resources, it shall be the policy of the Commonwealth to conserve, develop, and utilize its natural resources, its public lands, and its historical sites and buildings. Further, it shall be the Commonwealth’s policy to protect its atmosphere, lands, and waters from pollution, impairment, or destruction, for the benefit, enjoyment, and general welfare of the people of the Commonwealth.

Law Review.

For note on private remedies to abate water pollution, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 477 (1971).

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

For article, “Virginia Natural Resources Law and the New Virginia Wetlands Act,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 19 (1973).

For comment on nonpoint pollution control in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 539 (1979).

For article discussing issues relating to toxic substances litigation, focusing on the Fourth Circuit, see 16 U. Rich L. Rev. 247 (1982).

For article discussing common-law principles underlying public interests in tidal water resources, see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 835 (1982).

For note discussing the issues of eminent domain and water allocation as related to coal slurry pipelines, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1983).

For article on public access to Virginia’s tidelands, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 669 (1983).

For article, “State Environmental Programs: A Study in Political Influence and Regulatory Failure,” see 31 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 823 (1990).

For note, “Protecting the Environment:
Creating a Citizen Standing-to-Sue Statute in Virginia,” see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1991).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 2. Conservation and development of natural resources and historical sites.

In the furtherance of such policy, the General Assembly may undertake the conservation, development, or utilization of lands or natural resources of the Commonwealth, the acquisition and protection of historical sites and buildings, and the protection of its atmosphere, lands, and waters from pollution, impairment, or destruction, by agencies of the Commonwealth or by the creation of public authorities, or by leases or other contracts with agencies of the United States, with other states, with units of government in the Commonwealth, or with private persons or corporations. Notwithstanding the time limitations of the provisions of Article X, Section 7, of this Constitution, the Commonwealth may participate for any period of years in the cost of projects which shall be the subject of a joint undertaking between the Commonwealth and any agency of the United States or of other states.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

§ 3. Natural oyster beds.

The natural oyster beds, rocks, and shoals in the waters of the Commonwealth shall not be leased, rented, or sold but shall be held in trust for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, subject to such regulations and restriction as the General Assembly may prescribe, but the General Assembly may, from time to time, define and determine such natural beds, rocks, or shoals by surveys or otherwise.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions relating to oysters and clams, see §§

28.2-500

through

28.2-562

.

Law Review.

For note on private remedies to abate water pollution, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 477 (1971).

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For article discussing common-law principles underlying public interests in tidal water resources, see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 835 (1982).

For article on public access to Virginia’s tidelands, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 669 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, § 10;
8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2;
14A M.J. Oysters, §§ 1, 3.

§ 4. Right of the people to hunt, fish, and harvest game.

The people have a right to hunt, fish, and harvest game, subject to such regulations and restrictions as the General Assembly may prescribe by general law.

Enactment ratified Nov. 7, 2000. —

A new section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1999 Regular Session (Acts 1999, c. 932) and was referred to the 2000 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2000, cc. 802 and 1016) and submitted to the people on November 7, 2000. The enactment is effective January 1, 2001.

Law Review.

For Essay, “Article I, Section 13 of the Virginia Constitution: Of Militias and an Individual Right to Bear Arms,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 215 (2013).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Operation of shotgun sports center is not a protected right. —

The operation of a shotgun sports center or sporting clays facility is not a constitutionally protected right under the constitutional right to hunt, fish, and harvest game. Orion Sporting Group, LLC v. Bd. of Supervisors, 68 Va. Cir. 195, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 99 (Amherst County June 29, 2005).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Restrictions on right to hunt and fish. —

Prohibition on hunting on Sundays does not transgress the constitutional right to hunt and fish. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. Chapman Petersen, Member, Senate of Virginia, 11-032, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (/11).